Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201986-1204
Antenna, defined.

Antenna means communications equipment that transmits or receives electromagnetic radio frequency signals used in providing wireless services.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 4.
September 1, 2019